[Daily Discussion] Wednesday, July 04, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Thursday, July 05, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8w7k00/daily_discussion_thursday_july_05_2018/)
Everytime I get to the gym BTC makes a serious move.

Guess I’m going to stop going to gym.

Incoming dad bod. I’ll be fat and happy 
The meme is real with binance lol

 [https://imgur.com/yvi2Tg7](https://imgur.com/yvi2Tg7)
That's probably the quickest a BGD has been retraced.  

https://www.tradingview.com/x/S2SCqSsr/

We are on the verge of breaking down from the purple ascending wedge thing.  IF we do, then we will probably tumble down the last downtrend line (green) just like we tumbled down the downtrend from the ATH (dark blue).  Five rejections from the 6800 (thick yellow).  Could form an IHS if we break down and bounce up from the green trend line and retest 6800.  

There is still the possibility we dont break down and we break up but because of the rejections from 6800 the probability is low and we just have to go sideways for a couple hours and run into the support again.

[edit] It's first and goal on the one yard line to break down and you have Marshawn Lynch in the backfield but anything can still happen.
!short XBTUSD close 6669

Posted earlier this was a scalp trade, and made a nice 6.2% gain on my stack. 

Very bull flag like. Consolidation+ declining volume. 
Expecting this to break up at some point in next 24 hours

https://www.tradingview.com/x/J7YNthcc/

If this is a flag, I would have had time to close at a lower price point but today is the 4th and I’ll be at the beach bar with no cell service in a few hours so better safe than sorry. 


I was grilling and playing ball with my dog this evening for July 4th here in _Canada_, so I haven't been around much to track the charts. Anyway, the bear div played out as expected. I probably would have ridden my short for longer if I were around my computer today. Regardless, alts were looking pretty strong, and BTC's price looked more like a bull flag than a bart, so I'm surprised it broke down so quickly. 

With this in mind, I think we're likely forming a IH&S on the 6H. If this plays out as expected, we'll prob see a low at a minimum of 6300/6400. I'm slowly scaling into a small long on the way down just in case, and will likely cut bait if it starts looking bearish.

!long xbtu18 6520 10x 10%
One little pump away from 3D squishy turning green and anyone worth their salt knows that that means. Bears have about 48 hours to get us below 6400 and keep us there essentially otherwise it's time to rally for a month unless an indicator that has been true since forever after periods of massive pain and retracement is going to be broken. Feel free to go all the way back to 2013 and look at this fact.

Either-way I'm well positioned to profit regardless but I'll be far happier if we rally hard and it's looking like that squishy is going to go green.

That or we fake out into the green, get a mini rally and then MAX PAIN. 
lost 1.5k today. rekt
time for a cig and beer
People liquidating to buy fireworks 
I have the feeling we will see some moves soon.

!long XBTUSD 6529 10X 10%
What is it? A pump for ants? Continuing tradition...
I was trading off the MACD and 1Hour Ichimoku cloud (turned out it was just a trap), glad I closed my short early. But still fucking bitter I lost some money ... today I shouldn't trade (because I am mad)
Just closed an insane trade. PnL was +17% on full stack. Taking a few weeks off. Good luck boys
Rising wedge?

Yay or Nay?
Looks like we dont want to close under the 30D MA
https://www.tradingview.com/x/mULiT5iy/

If we break up from this black resistance and stay above it for a few days i'll consider going long. Same for the rising wedge but with a short. Not rushing.
The BGD prophecy is alive!!
!long XBTUSD close 6682

Fell asleep underwater, woke up in a small profit. I would like to see what happens next. I was ready to take a loss with this position so i feel lucky
Does this look like a possible Inverted H&S???

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/KQBcfxHN/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/KQBcfxHN/)

Kinda sloppy but yeah I'm trying to look at all the possible scenarios. 

That daily candle is also right inbetween both the 10 and 30 EMA so it'll be interesting to see where this goes. 
I have the feeling 6600-6650 will hold as the new support, try to scrape some profit.

!long BTCUSD 6660 5x 5%

Take profit at 6900

SL at 6580
Took a new long at 6580 swaps, whose size is half as big as the profits I took at 6750 earlier today on december futs.  Glad to have that back in.

Didn't add to existing positions because it's just easier to manage separately like this to not chop up the existing positions, and I can do less calculations in the heat of the moment when making new position than adding (and wasn't gonna add with pre-set orders, that's been tricky for me in recent price action).  Will use this position for a scalp, hope to hold the others for more than a couple days.

Let's see if this lasts, will let it go if this breaks out of the newly drawn support line of the bear-trap rising wedge.  And if I do that then take a smidgen of profit from one of the other longs to compensate for that loss before they potentially get stopped out at break even (sept 6400, dec 6450, I shouldn't have rage-added to sept yesterday, it's ca woulda been sub 6200 still, 6400 is precariously close)

I'm feeling ridiculous.

Edit: new long didn't last very long

Edit 2:  lol ok I'm chopping myself up a little.  I exited that new long at 6543.5, and ended up reentering at 6543 minutes later after it bounced back up off the 30 min, 1 hr, and 4hr clouds.  Need to promise myself I won't do that enter/exit dance again on this position, ate the market fees 3 times now.  It's back above the support I had drawn, but I just realized that I could draw the support a tad different and have us testing against it as resistance.

Also sold 25% of the december position to pay for the shenanigans of that enter/exit, in case it continues to drop and I don't get another chance.  Only half of the swaps position is effectively new now.

Edit 3 PS: This shit I do (is it even bad?) is why I can't use the position bot for the time being.  If I was using the bot to register my exit, I could have missed the re-entrance.  And if anyone had dared to follow it'd suck in either case.
Possible small ascending wedge on 1h.  
[https://www.tradingview.com/x/q9cWQV4I/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/q9cWQV4I/)
what in the hootin' and hollerin' was that?
5555 monthly low protected again, pop through 7800 and i think we see another bull market and new highs. 
[deleted]
That is some weeeaaaaak volume to drop on
*A historical hopium-fueled bullish spin on the Binance hack:*

During the late-19th/early-20th century when the American financial/banking system was in it's infancy, actual bank robberies were prolific -- first on the American Frontier and later during the Depression Era. In fact, the FBI was formed as a way to combat "public enemy" organized crime specializing in such heists.

Of course, thanks to the [fast] evolution of security large-scale bank robberies became virtually non-existent.

Bitcoin/cryptocurrency is still relatively new, but the security/storage side of things is fast evolving. While this hack sucks (along with all the others) for the public image of cryptocurrency, I really don't think it will affect the price as much as a few years back (e.g. Mt. Gox). Furthermore, products like Coinbase Custody are huge in terms of gaining trust from larger players who may not be as mindful of security in this new asset class.

**Tl;dr This is good for Bitcoin^tm**
This is just history repeating it's self, I've been here before and I'll be here again.

What I think is going to happen in the following weeks... Many of you are going to keep shorting this shit and get burnt, unless you're smart and know that the direction is up from here and you're simply scalping the BGDs. At some point in the next few days we are going to move down strongly with a lot of you thinking that you were right all along and that this was simply a bull trap/short hunting. Except we will then revert right the back up and then up into 7XXX+

Some of you then will start saying 'maybe this really is a reversal' and start buying in with the RSI at some stupid fucking number and get burnt with the violent pullbacks probably selling at the bottom of them before the resumption upwards.

My advice for those that are clueless right now, wait for the RSI on the 30M to fall below 35 in the coming days and enter a long and sit on it awhile. For bonus points try catch the knives, look at where previous highs were on strong wicks and set buy orders there when the RSI gets close to the aforementioned number. 

Note - like any advice I give here it's my assumptions, this I think has a very high likelyhood of playing out, if you want to be extra safe wait for us to get above 6900 to confirm the 3D squishy narrative and then look for a good entry point.
Lmao everytime price rises a bit there's an exchange getting hacked
SAR flipped to bull on Bitstamp 3 day charts.  Not too many fake-outs for this indicator.

edit: removed extra words
EOS appears to be out of ETH finally.  I’m very interested to see how this affects the market now.

https://i.redd.it/4r8dzv20xp711.jpg
1d looks pretty nice, like it wants to reverse, crossed over the middle bollinger and the bearish volume is pretty weak - even with the hack. 3d macd also looking to crossover.  
a bit worried about the huge amounts of longs, but the funding is still good (0.04 and 50+ million)   
so feeling a little bullish, going to keep my long open until breakeven(~6350). don't think its the biggest risk to open a small long here either
What's your guys' favorite blockchain explorer?
Does anyone have any reading recommendations for viewing market movements from a psychological perspective? I'm increasingly coming to the perspective that movements within the market are dictated by the sum-total of perspectives of what is going to transpire next. It makes sense to me that the reoccurance of chart patterns for example is an indicator of a particular market mentality of all the traders... Not group think, but competing ideologies with one being right and winning out by share weight of force. 

I'm sure that someone far smarter than myself has written volumes on the subject and hopefully one of you fine people can point me in the right direction.
There is a bit of emergent fractal symmetry here when comparing against April-May run. If candles are constrained to current volatility they neatly bump up against the bottom of the giant pennant at around $7.6k before forecasting another move down into the low $5's.

[Chart](https://www.tradingview.com/x/Rn8Em2tU/)

Of course there's no guarantee we repeat the cycle, but it's a possible template for this run.  I personally don't think the bear market is over but everything moves in cycles/waves.  Mid $7's in a 4-6 week time frame seem plausible to me.
I managed to trade this big green candle, but the thing was it was luck and the whole thing transpired while I was brushing my teeth.

This market is ridiculous, these big moves are happening on the 1m candles and if you aren’t staring directly at them, and quite lucky, it feels like gambling. 

I keep getting lucky, but even I can admit when none of this seems to be proportional to the actual use case of BTC (or alts for that matter), since most of the “valuation” for BTC is based on speculation now, and it feels like speculators are getting more and more disenfranchised, I can’t help but feel like the exuberance isn’t grounded in reality. 
Anyone catch that 6776 candle to short? If so, I admire ya. I freaking missed it cause I was out running around. Fair play to whomever caught the winning scalp today.
Anybody else still think Bitcoin is in a macro-bullmarket? When you zoom out really far, you can see that it's consolidating very high up considering how much it has risen in the previous year or two. I really don't think the bubble has popped yet. Sure it may take 6 months to a year for it to truly bull again... but where does it end?
Damn. Condolences to the shorts out there. That was the mother of all bear traps.
All in 3x on september futures at $6,502, no stops. I dont want to spend my summer staring at graphs.

Edit: I'll probably settle in the 8-9k range if there is a nice premium. I'll deposit more fiat and add to my position between 5 and 5.5k if we get there. 

Edit2: Well, I timed that nicely. All luck, no skill.
Wow.. almost everyone on this sub and other chat groups is closing shorts / opening new longs.

I'm still holding my short from 65xx, but bears do seem fucking weak. Not that bulls seem particularly strong.. (gradually creeping up the price)
Higher lows and higher highs on the 4hr still continuing since the June 24 low.  The pattern invalidates with a drop below the last low of 6411.  Till then I'll hold my long and continue riding the pattern.
**Position Bot Update**

Added some more channels to the **PushBullet** system for /u/mandy7 and /u/Coingurrruu

Anyone following them just go to their History page and subscribe to the PushBullet channel

As usual, any requests, bugs or ideas just PM me.

TD sell setup is likely going to print when the current 1h candle closes. This is where I usually pay close attention to price action. If price doesn't correct and just blows past this level, it's usually a good sign that price will head north. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/nxd4f93M/
Almost overbought on the 6hr, but rising rsi on the pumps is bullish, you all think we break 6800 and run a bit by EOD?
new futures contracts open tonight (tomorrow? 5th of July), I am really interested to see how this would affect the action.
I'm seeing a bearish divergence on pretty much all the timeframes at the moment, can someone else confirm? (I'm never sure of the relevance)
Also we're being rejected under the support of the rising wedge line before the 'fakeout', I'm not feeling particularly bullish at the moment...

What I'm looking at right now, for reference:
[https://www.tradingview.com/x/2YiZEEbZ/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/2YiZEEbZ/)

Reinstalled some apps from old backups, the alarms were still there in Bitcoin Checker, 843 USD. :)
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSDT/WtSv4fhw-Hedge-it/

pew pew sniper

Current idea https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSDT/6iRjGpMn-Dump-it/
this daily looks now very shooting star like and it closes in 45 min. 
These assholes are gonna pull this nonsense on America’s birthday?
Currently short from 6724, ideally I'd like to close it around 6300. Probably will close some at 6450. Although a daily bull div is still playing out, we are right under the 6800 resistance level, bull volume is decreasing, there is rising wedge like structure, and potential bear div on the 4hr.

https://imgur.com/a/MpZOz59
Usually bearish but unusually bullish
Just saw a post on r/cryptocurrency that states how dumb people are for having money in a bank account or 401k and that the smartest thing to do is move all your money into crypto. 

Seeing people who actually believe that, still in the market, makes me think we’ve still got room to drop. 

/s
!long BTCUSD 6666 5x 5%

Take profit at 6900

SL at 6580

P/S: Gotta repost since I did not know it is not possible to open 2 XBTUSD position with the bot.
I must admit that I am amazed by the market's resiliency through this relatively terrible news about Binance's possibly missing coins over these past few hours.
Rekt those shorting on Bitmex again
Just entered a short here seeing as the RSI is hot, MACD is somewhat truning down on some timeframes and were on the top of the wedge having squeezed some shorts on this 10&#37; ish bounce. Will add more if we get to 6.85K and reevaluate at 7K. Also not feeling bullish enough to go long while in the wedge. Were also pushing the top Bband so there should be decent resistance here included with the 6.8K ish horisontal resistance.

!short BTCUSD 6710 10X 100&#37;
I've learned to accept life's message of waking up to a BGD that has forced its will on me
For all of you 25x degens out there, make sure you use stops even if you are on isolated margin and use liquidation as your stop loss.

When I first started (not all that long ago),  I didn't realise that you will actually be liquidated before your entire margin is used, the difference goes to the insurance fund. If you close your position 50c before liquidation, you will get something back.
return of the barts
This will be a very nice daily close for bears.
Disclaimer: short bias

Comparison with April: https://www.tradingview.com/x/CgE2rX0z/

For April, the ascending wedge-ish pattern that I drew is ugly, maybe even invalid, but the idea of slowing momentum during the ~15% increase is similar to the current situation.
 
Zoom-in on current situation: https://www.tradingview.com/x/XYHGf5sy/

I don't see why whales would be so kind to pump BTC right now to 6800 where many traders are drooling to open short positions. I see two scenarios. Many seem to be anticipating the orange inverse H&S pattern, understandably because the upper pink rectangle has been established as a strong support. The blue line would correspond to almost 100% retracement followed by a BGD, similar to the pattern in April.
Hidden bullish divergence on the shorter time frames; doesn't have to play out though

https://imgur.com/a/AWllXtt

Edit: I bought in back at around 6600, which maybe was a little early,  but I’m trading alts only now and the price was around 8-12% down, which was very appealing to me;

I think we are in the uptrend, so that’s just scalping for me 
Hey guys. Any suggestion on where to margin trade the ETH/BTC spot? i used to trade on polo but the volumes look really bad the last months
GBTC selling at almost 50% premium. Is this an indicator of sorts?
I'm just shamelessly shorting the tops at this point. I'm still trying to stick to my targets of a $6800 high with a max of around $7500, but I'm willing to have my mind changed if this starts showing some more natural growth.

To be perfectly frank, I woke up right after the bounce happened, and haven't had a chance to track the charts yet. However, the price seems to be moving up a bit too fast for my taste, which concerns me that we may be a bit overbought at the moment.

I may close this short early if it starts looking like it has legs, but I was kind of expecting this sort of action after the Binance API issue failed to drop the price yesterday. It seems someone was propping the price up with all the shorts opened up yesterday to set up for a nice squeeze.

Who knows where it's headed from here though, because we're now at our first key resistance level.

!short xbtu18 6725 10x 10%
nice BGD
Am I the only one who does not see the bull flag? I see regular choppy chop...
How do you tell if a dump is a fakeout or a serious dump? Any experienced traders that can enlighten the noob which is me? Because every pump lately has a huge dump right before it.
Fundsu are safu
Really does seem the market just doesn't want to go down. Yesterday's refusal to bart coupled with today's honey badger attitude toward the Binance incident... very interesting.

I know the Binance loss isn't huge but still. If there was bottled up fear in the market, the reaction to this specific incident would have been at least half-decent.
Friends on Facebook are asking me if this is the start of a new bull run.

We're still under 7k, what's wrong with people.
After lately news. Bithumb, Japan and now binance, etc. Price is holding pretty good. 
Bitfinex long:short ratio currently 1.54. IIRC the April BGD resulted from a long:short ratio of 0.8 so conversely this *could* set up the table for a hellish long squeeze. 
Painting a nice little bull flag right now, similar to the $6400 range

https://www.tradingview.com/x/8iTdFlNB/

Less bart flag like ( Sloping upwards, crazy stop loss wicks in both directions, no clear direction, volume increasing)

Expecting some consolidation in the $6575-$6700 range for the next 12-24 hours.

Waiting for volume confirmation on the flag ( decreasing volume + consolidation ) 

Still short from $6769 and will hold for now. Was planning to scalp it but I’ll hold on and close towards the bottom of the flag and possibly swap long. 

So I sold my 6625 short at 6480 yesterday, and that 6500 holds up well today feels good. Over reaction for news to the downside is a classic bear move and this quick bounce back fits quite well with the less %in every dump 
reopened a short here, closed over night my short @ 6450 USD, had it effectivly from 6.74k
wtf
Rising wedge on the 4h chart still fitting perfectly

https://i.imgur.com/T4jkxH1.png
Anyone having issues with tradingview atm? Specifically do you have an issue scaling the price in/out? I can scale the time but not the price which is annoying...
Alts not forming higher highs,  BTC 4h RSI not forming higher highs. Small correction incoming. But this formation made me short term bullish again. Retracement to 6.3k then we will finally test 7.3k again.
almost got stopped out on this! lucky it did not went 20 USD more up. would be a stop effectily at break even, fuck all this effort to buils a good short postion would be worth nothing if we move above 6.8k...
Flipping back to long at a loss after exiting on the off chance Binance was significant. I did say I was going to cut it quick. Essentially CA on this long position is a little below 6k now.

!short btcusd close 6515
With all these bullish people I wouldn't mind a nice long squeeze.
Bear div on the 1h: [https://imgur.com/a/uKjl8kH](https://imgur.com/a/uKjl8kH)

I stick to my short... SL still at break even (adding this and my last short together) at 6810.
!short XBTUSD 6769.8 5x 33% 

Pulled all of my stacked orders last night. 

Managed to marked sell  this 

I probably shoudlnt get in the way, looks like it has heat 
Are you still shorting at 6800?  Bitcoin is really surprising me now.  Hack did nothing (previous VIA hack in March kicked off a price drop for weeks/months) and now the BGD.
Of these last three BGDs, each has had less volume than the last.
Bart up bleed down, bart up bleed down, bart up bart down. Very bullish indeed.
Can't wait for the BGD that pierces through 6800 like there is only hot air there.
!long XBTUSD 6582 3X 20%

Because reasons
https://steemit.com/crypto-news/@jcharming/the-daily-dimes-a-cryptonews-publish-07-04-18

Basic binance news coverage, and some notes on BTC local charts, if anyone wants to comment on the half/up barts we're seeing I'd be interested to get some theories back. 
Do any of you daytrade using huge margin? I was just playing with it last night, going back & forth with longs & shorts using >5min charts & the full 100x magin on bitmex. Used all market orders to get filled instantly. Realized they take 15% in fees so I needed at least 16% to keep it rolling but that could be seen within 30 seconds before it drops.. I made a ton of back to back trades (over a dozen or so) doing this last night before I got lucky with a nice % gain when it shot up from 6460 to ~65something which was way higher than the movements I seen during the hour I was watching. That happened in seconds so I know those types of movements will wipe out any position I have if it doesn't go my way. I only started with a $100 worth tho so it was mainly for fun... but I'm thinking with all this volatility, if I set an overall target say to make 100$ for the day with this and stop at the target it might be sustainable to make more then I lose throughout the week. 
No?

 How do you guys scalp the movements? Or do you typically just stick to one direction with little to no margin and sit it out?
Don't use binance APIs is all that is to be gleaned from this incident.
No sure if this is the right part of the sub but what do you guys think about the eth/btc ratio right now.

Cheers
So we watching both an ascending wedge & a bull flag??  gotta love BTC and its beautiful contradictions. I'm leaning bearish looking the indicators on the 30m time-frame - but yea might just sit on the sidelines for this one. 
Stopped out of my hedge Binance FUD Short last night at @ $6515

!short close XBTUSD 6515 

Out of position until 6800 or 6350. 

Today is 4th of July in America. Have some beers, go to the beach, and eat some burgers. 

##God bless America 
Putting in orders to add to my short from 6610 at 6794 in case we get another 6800 attempt. Stop loss 4H close above 8650.

Still holding long Sept futures but taking profits on alts if they follow this pump
I bought a bit on this dip yesterday. Have some profits, but no margin 100x type gamble profits, just spot.

Advice on take profit and stops would be appreciated. I'm thinking of letting profits ride and stops at the breakdown of 6300ish.
Has anyone been able to make new API keys on Binance?  I'm getting "param_error" when I click the confirmation email.

EDIT: I was finally able to make one after many attempts and some time passed.  Just keep trying if you are having issues.
Is there a Bitfinex testnet? There doesn't seem to be one, if so is the approach to call the live API with small orders if you are developing code to call the Bitfinex API?
Does anyone have any experience comparing price action in relation to both Bitmex futures and the OKEX quarterly futures contract?

I've heard a few people paying closer attention to the premium/discount of OKEX contracts, simply because OKEX have been around longer than Bitmex and there's supposedly more experienced traders there.

Currently the OKEX contracts are trading at a premium, compared to Bitmex contracts sitting at a discount... Quite interesting...
we get all these moves often just shortly before the end of the tightening of the bbands (esp. 30m ) here, thats new.
i have a noob question

because i am studying technical analysis, i noticed that it may be a double top on xbt/usd or reversal? i think it is going down? 
Binance back up trading in 10 mins. Should be a shitshow. Good luck everyone. 


Edit: Completely thought people would sell off after not being able to move their coins and all of this binance fud. 30 minutes in and it looks like I am completely incorrect, and I am pretty happy about that! 
https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=2016-06-04%202018-07-04&geo=US&q=buy%20bitcoin,fidget%20spinners

Two fads, compared side by side.  Nearly identical.

Here's what two useful services look like compared side to side:

https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=all&geo=US&q=twitter,snapchat

Notice how all of the above grow exponentially, but the utilized and used services plateau off and don't drop straight down?  The fads just die off as quickly as they started.

Load ze Binance FUD
Ready for  a new 24H high?
Binance still frozen in time.
Closing my short i did to hedge against the possible binance hack, still think it was't a bad idea since  i was either making a ton of profit or having a really small loss 
Rising wedge. I bought into the same situation not too long ago.

This time I'm more careful. Yes, it *might* break out to the top. But I don't buy it...
The pumps from the $5700s are progressively getting smaller each time.  Probably won't even make it to $7000 before it sets new yearly lows.  No buy pressure outside of the manipulated pumps, just stagnation and decline.
Being a Bitcoin/Litecoin maximalist loyal to Coinbase is beautiful
On the 1h chart it raises every hour. Something?
[deleted]
FUCKKKKK YEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA

3D SQUISHY AF  


MUCH PROFIT
Read the binances twitter, they don’t sound very professional with their tweets I believe they are still hacked or something is going on and they don’t want us to know something. 
Binance users: Binance screwed me again. I'm withdrawing everything as soon as they re-enable withdrawals.

Binance: Guys, funds are safu. Here, have some  fee discount.

Binanace users: Yay! I love binance.

Every. Fucking. Time.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you don't think this slow rise is due to people adding fiat to fund further shorts then... idk
[deleted]
[removed]
Shorted at 6775, trailing stop, now at 6716. IMO should see at least some what of a down move from here :) Low 65s to the minimums, Lows 63s or 62s if I am lucky.
[deleted]
i remember during some desperate times i even wanted to bring the laptop to the gym with me just so i could manually open/close my position
You can open your short @ 6800 ahha
Secure asset fund for users (SAFU) lololol
This is why I love crypto and Binance.
This is ohne of the Best Things i've witnessed so far. SAFU
damn, now it's no longer a meme
Secure Trust Fund for Users
It hasn't been retraced, and it's been almost 24 hours. Didn't read beyond "Quickest ever retraced" for that reason.

These dumps are just getting weaker and more pathetic all the time. Take advantage of the discounts. These low, low prices won't last.
> but today is the 4th and I’ll be at the beach bar with no cell service in a few hours so better safe than sorry. 

That's the sort of discipline and awareness I need to strive for most.  My top worst losses have been from leaving things open at inappropriate unmanageable times.

Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 6,769.80

* Average value: 6,769.80

* Closing value: 6,669.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 33.00%

* PnL: 1.24%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I almost cut my short when I saw you and /u/Coingurrruu closed yours, but I'm glad I didn't.

Maybe I'll close it around 6400, depending upon how it looks then.
Plenty of times when it has turned green then straight back to red again
> 3D squishy

MACD? or?
I believe
*** Joint and Johnny walker red 
Bitcoin giveth and taketh
To some in here, that is a lot of money. To others in here, that is peanuts.

Posting losses/gains in anything but % terms doesnt really mean anything to anybody. That could be 1% of your stack or 100%.
SFYL man.

(btw best to keep actual numbers private to keep communication in here neutral, and to protect yourself in general)
!short XBTUSD update 6537 6x 10%
liquidating to buy popcorn and watch fireworks.
I charged $5 a car for parking to watch them. Made out 700USD
That timing!!!
Satoshi?
This guy.
lol nice
Awesome call! Although my underwater hedge short from 6350 hates you even more now !
Damn, thank you guys, I was hitting myself for not take profit a part of my long at 6650 yesterday and rebuy at 6450 today, but finally a late call is still good enough. The reason I can call the move is 1% talent and 99% pure luck, lol.
This was the "funds are safu" pump.... that got immediately shorted by smart money. lol
> today I shouldn't trade (because I am mad)

Solid advice for yourself. Walk away from the charts for a bit. Go outside. 
Sounds like high risk, but glad it worked out for you this time.
There's just too many ways to draw the descending channel.  Think I'm gonna give up trying to play it's support/resistance lines, every new way that pops up to draw those lines soon gets inconsistently violated anyway.   Gonna stick with playing horizontal zones.
I find it interesting that you consider going long with a chart that shows a very nice ascending wedge. 
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtusd

* Opening value: 6,642.00

* Average value: 6,642.00

* Closing value: 6,682.00

* Leverage: 3.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: 0.35%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I wouldn't bother entertain that thought until we see the right shoulder confirm
Yup. I’ve been keeping an eye on this.

Made a post about it yesterday 
Bad take profit setup imho.. right above the arguably strongest resistence... for a scalp i would recommend 67xx. R/R on that trade is not the best.
Now what in tarnation?!
Bull market will be here before you notice it.
You are that confident that 7801 means 20,001...umm..ok
I'll be half convinced of bull market at 10k, moreso at 12k, bulltard with ATH in mind past 13k. Right now, just no.
>entering a position here is pure gambling 

Shorting here is one of the best short entires in the 6K range. 

Horizontal resistance, multiples failed attempts to push through. It’s acted as crazy resistance in the past 2 weeks. 

Longing here is a pure gamble 
There is no way we'll break 6.8 on first push, don't think we can do this on second one.
The outcome is a break out upward 7000 and a correction back to $6650 
Volume has been weak for months. BTC nosedive incoming. 
So, you're saying where cryptocurrencies are in its lifecycle is comparable to the late-19th/early-20th century American financial/banking system? That's pretty exciting, really.
>  I really don't think it will affect the price as much as a few years back (e.g. Mt. Gox).

What a bold statement.  The Gox collapse caused BTC to drop something like 30% in an hour.  So you are saying that we won't drop $2000+ in the next hour....great insight.
I have a feeling this rambling prediction will beat out all manner of TA on all but the longest timeframes.
This is similar to what I wrote yesterday but way more eloquently put. Well done
Having been here for a while, I agree with you, some form of what you're describing is extremely likely to happen
Basically agree... I think we'll bump our heads on $6.8-$6.9k and get a retrace... but 3d MACD is flirting with a crossover and the fact that 4hr didn't even make it below 50 before another move up is pretty bullish... there's some real potential here for a more prolonged rally
This post is needlessly antagonistic, but in a winsome way. Well done. 
history repeats itself until it does not
This time is different™
Bullshit
Think it’s more nefarious use of API keys than a “hack”. People who signed up to some random boy service.

Edit: BOT SERVICE, I meant Bot service!

Edit2: Lol at your funny comments guys. It was autocorrect on my phone.
What is SAR?
20k by friday.
It would be a really useful metric to take all (or most) ERC-20 token contributions as an aggregate and see how much is left to dump. 
It has been for about one month already. The ERC-20 tokens were frozen the moment the mainnet launched, and mainnet has been up and running since early June.

edit: never mind, I misunderstood your post!
> I’m very interested to see how this affects the **YATCH** market now.

FTFY


blockchain.info
Coinchair or blocktrail.
I don't think it's going to be as useful as you think. Sure it'll be interesting, but the reason why psychology is considered a soft science even though they follow research methods and statistical analysis and stuff, is because humans are diverse and change. Andit might just be one of many reasons for movement.

I know we try to make sense of the world, and to an extent we can find some patterns but it's still not that simple. Good luck though I think this subject is interesting, and psychology in general. 

Anyways, I did this google search and found many links but only skimmed a couple.

https://www.google.ca/search?q=stock+market+psychology&rlz=1C1CHBF_enCA757CA757&oq=stock+market+psychol&aqs=chrome.0.0j69i57j0l4.2409j0j7&sourceid=chrome&ie=UTF-8
1. Reminiscences of a Stock Operator – by Edwin Lefevre.

2. Market Wizards – book series by Jack Schwager.

3. Trading in the Zone – by Mark Douglas.

4. Trade Your Way to Financial Freedom – by Van K. Tharp.

5. The Art of Thinking Clearly – by Rolf Dobelli.
I noticed this as well. It's why I'm targeting a top at around 8200-8400 at the .382 fib line before the next leg down.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/zOGcSTGD/
Would BTC moving to mid $8s negate this possible cycle? 
If you trade by your gut it's like a roulette.

If you use TA it's more like poker.

But yeah. Still gambling. Like every other stock. This one is just more volatile.
> and quite lucky, it feels like gambling.

It is absolutely gambling lately on the smaller time frames. You either bet on BGD or BRD.      

> I can’t help but feel like the exuberance isn’t grounded in reality.

Of course it's not.
It’s not that it “feels like gambling”... it IS gambling.
I’m short from $6769, market sell too. 

Close enough 

I was going to close here for a scalp, but may just hold on a tad longer 
Since you asked, short at 6788
Yes. Since 2009.
I mean if you arbitrarily redefine the word "bull market" it can mean whatever you want it to mean.
1 MilliOON if you ask mr monkey
What was the % of that rise..3%.  Relatively minor.  You must be new to this market if you think that's in the top percentile of bear traps.
rip
Small bart + lack of Binance FUD dump should have bears on their toes.

I personally  just think this 6500 range is terrible for any entry 
> Wow.. almost everyone on this sub and other chat groups is closing short

What % is "almost everyone"  95%?   I disagree it is anywhere near that.
What exactly does this mean?

Also where is the PushBullet Channel 
The problem with Bearish Div is you can not be sure if the price will increase or will stop, If price continues to increase, the RSI will rise too, and then no more Bearish Div. Even if the price consolidate, but later it increases, still no more Bearish Div. This signal is pretty laggy so it is more suitable for longer time frame like 1D.
You are right about short timeframes. 

However, the bearish divergence is not confirmed on the 1D chart
Yup outlook very bearish indeed
Solid work. Thinking retrace back to 66XX and then we wait. 
He’s drunk, quick damp eet
Good play! Not going to lie, I'm jealous not catching that candle to short.
You're either going to make a 2 percent gain on a scalp or you're gonna get rekt. Take your gains and consider yourself lucky.
Unbearable 
I don't care how much Bitcoin goes up, my retirement vehicles are staying in safe, boring mutual funds 
If you're under 22-24 and have little to no savings it's easy to make claims like that, so I totally get it. 

If they're any older than that they're a complete retard.
That post is 100% correct.
\>Seeing people who actually believe that, still in the market, makes me think we’ve still got room to drop.

Thats just because crypto has a lot of retail investors who are vocal. Which is why discussion of alts especially usually leads to arguments similar to sports fans. Of course you'll get radicals and desperate people upvoting them in such an environment. Even if we dump to $3k or $4k you'll never get rid of moon boys.
Except that you can see isolated incidents of people saying things like that during bull markets, during bear markets, at the bottom, at the top, and everything in between, and you can also see people saying the opposite at all times.

The reality then is that seeing that comment is not the actual reason you think there's still room to drop, you had to have believed it anyway before, and what would actually be constructive and substantive is to understand the actual reasons you think it's going to drop.
Not really indicative of market's strength. BTC dropped $1000 in 24 hours two days after Bithumb's hacking. Whales decide when to dump (and pump), not the news
Yes, maybe we are getting used to these incidents. 
> relatively terrible news about Binance's possibly missing coins

You mean the barely significant (to the overall market) number of coins that dipshits who don't take security seriously lost?
Indeed. I wasn't too familiar with Binance until tonight, but the fact that they've apparently handled previous hacks well seems to have given people (relative) confidence that it wouldn't be too disruptive. Interesting. 
Forming a pretty classic bear flag, expecting further downside soon
Drop was + / - 150$. That's all?? Is nothing.
Seen more drops around midnight Europe time. So not really an issue.
That's because the market doesn't tank or spike upwards due to 99% of people buying or selling.  It is controlled/manipulated by a handful of people now and if they don't want it to drop too far, it won't.
>Rekt those shorting on Bitmex again

Yep, looks like a lot of gamblers lost during that 3% spike.

https://mobile.twitter.com/bitmexrekt
Yup shorting a good idea right now. Market seems to be bearish. I am also.adding to my shortd
stupid question: what the f is BGD???
Yes this is key! For example on 100x you might think you have 1% margin, but it's actually 0.5% because of the insurance fund, so it's best to actually **add to the margin**, and set a stop between 0.5~1%.

Also remember that liquidation is based on mark price not last price, and stop losses are ^usually safer on mark to prevent triggering from a single order's book-wiping wick.


welcome to the half Bart era
If I was a whale I would pump to 6800 and then pump further because everyone and their mother wants to short there.
If you don't mind me asking, which alts?
Bitmex is good for shorting the ratio
I'm using Kraken, but that's mainly because I live in the US
Crypto volume everywhere looks bad the last few months.
polo is dead, everyone looks to have moved to binance and other exchanges 
Sorts?
People with deep pockets/Wall Street says buy? That would be the logical conclusion. 
>I'm just shamelessly shorting the tops at this point. 

I had a close @ 6823 on Mex... Hit 6820.   


Motherfucker ; D
Non stop drops for months: fine

A few days of pump: we are moving too fast
Sorry to anyone tracking my trades - I still feel like this has the legs to move up further, I'm just trying to make profits along the way since we had just hit resistance.

!short xbtu18 close 6670

(Edit: Just wanted to add my justification. I would have liked a bigger move, but we're actually showing pretty good support so far from the former resistance-turned support in pink. I probably exited too early, considering we're dropping further so far, but I guess we'll see. I can't really get greedy in a spot like this. [https://www.tradingview.com/x/97770LKJ/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/97770LKJ/))
lol someone who is short saying the price is moving up too fast for his tastes 

no shit.
Why are you shorting? Do you enjoy losing money or are the shortbot sock puppets on this sub really that convincing? 

Seriously, why in God's name would you short here? 
I noticed that although there was a reduction in shorts, it wasn't nearly the same level of a squeeze as on Monday. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/uYA1T3p3/
suggest the sound of a cup for me;
the only one, there he is!
If you're short when it dumps, then it's a serious dump. If you're long when it dumps, then it's fake and manipulated
Volume, elasticity (volume/price movement), plasticity (how quickly the order book refills).

E: I would not consider myself an experienced trader.
Honestly it's easier than you think to tell real from fake dumps. If there's nothing obviously affecting the price and the recent growth is "natural" but there's still a random and unexpected dump, it's a fake out.
Is Binance back online?
It's down about $200 or over 3% in the last day or so.  So whether it "wants" to go down or not, it just did.
The market is down 4% but hey it "just doesnt want to go down".  LOL I guess only 10%+ losses count as down days in your eyes.
>what's wrong with people

I don't see how it's not extremely obvious that it is more profitable to catch it earlier rather than later. 
The thing about Bull and Bear markets, you don’t know until you’ve been in it a while. This could very well be the start of a Bull market.
Friend of mine wanted to buy XRP because his uncle told him it could go to 334 USD. Humans don't change.
he is actually asking a legit question, so i don't see any reasons for down votes; if the price was reaching 11k or so it would make a lot more sense for people that not really involved in crypto to think that this the beginning of a bull run
MOON WHEN???
Honestly btc doesn't give a fuck anymore one way or the other. 
With lots of cheap funding and longs having proved they have strong af hands, I don't think thats possible unless we somehow make a new low..
Unless we drop below 5k I don't think it's going to happen
This scares me a bit.   

Bull*flag ;)
That's a bull flag
>volume increasing

green volume candles on rise usually turns into red candles at the end of the rise and vice versa
It's retracing too quickly for my taste. We'll see soon enough...

Why the face 
Where tootie frootie 
2 points make a line, if you keep adjusting the pattern it can still fit perfectly when BTC is at 8k.
Yeah it fits perfectly now that you adjusted the support to compensate for that huge bear trap fakeout.
I think i had the same problem recently. You have to rightclick on the y-axis (price axis) and remove the checkmark at "auto scale" or/and "lock scale". 
Everything appears to be working properly on my end.
Giving more thought to this I see huge fake-out similar we had at the end of May. We have formed quite big raising wedge. All this upward movement can be interpreted as ABCDE correction (clear ABC on alts) and measured movement down would put us down to 4.8k. (5.4k first). Unless 55 4hr exp. moving average holds I'm out of any trades now. I'm not going to get caught where I don't want to be. BTC network volume is bellow 1M a day which is super odd for a week day, some crap with binance. Divergence on RSI. Something super fishy here.
Nice move mand 
Position closed with success



* Position: short btcusd

* Opening value: 6,460.00

* Average value: 6,460.00

* Closing value: 6,515.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -1.10%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


!long btcusd 6515 5X 100%
Be patient...in time, it is very high probability. 
Your message yesterday was something like 6k in next hours???.
I’d set very tight stops in case if btc breaks upwards from the rising wedge.

The divergence is on the bulls side now. By reading it I’d say that on the daily it looks like btc had bottomed at 57XX, and on the shorter timeframes we have a hidden divergence that says the uptrend will continue. Of course, it doesn’t always play out but it has been a pretty reliable indicator for me.
Hardly surprising, there are much fewer weak hands now than there were in March.

Funds are safu
> (previous VIA hack in March kicked off a price drop for weeks/months) 

No it didn't. Google when the news were announced and check when price started dropping.


Fuck it, I'll do it for you:

> [On Mar 7, UTC 14:58–14:59, within this 2 minute period, the VIA/BTC market experienced abnormal trading activity. Binance their automatic risk management system was triggered, and all withdrawals were halted immediately.](https://hackernoon.com/alleged-hack-of-binance-linked-to-viacoin-pump-bb9066bf96bf)

And here is BTC chart, I marked the candle when the VIA stuff happened https://www.tradingview.com/x/EvUnOfrY/

The price has been already dropping for two days after a clear as day double top. 

thats actually bullish. 

means less and less people are putting in sell orders in this range 
meaning? 
Check out the 4hr, the volume on the big green moves are pretty equal on all of em back to June 24th, and its really just this last spike that has less volume.
It Barts 5 percent up and bleeds 1 percent down three times in the past five days. If this continues, we'll hit a new ATH within a month.
You would probably not be able to recognize accumulation even if they litteraly spelled it using barts.
Would definetly get shorted into as big as it would be green
Almost, but rejected
Got to fantasize about something while down 65% for the year.
You can send the commands to the bot /u/position_bot  with a PM if you don't want to explain why.

This helps reduce the low effort posts here
I'm doing more and more daytrading on high leverage besides swing trading. 

A bit of advice: 

- use limit orders, it will help you with your timing eventually


- use a stochastic to have at least an idea to when the cycles will turn so you can time it well


- stay clear when patterns become tighter and volatility decreases


- it's easier after a big move 


- look for good setups, don't try to scalp every little move


- 3-15 min charts & trends is optimal on +50x leverage


- use stops lol


- greed is the biggest enemy and you need to be comfortable to trade +100k positions for it to be worth your time


Good luck! It isn't easy but it definitely pays once you get a decent win % and keep your losses small



"huge margin" is just gambling

might as well go to Vegas and put it all on red or black


Stick to 25x if ur gonna do that so you dont get instaliquidated and dont use your whole stack unless you are willing to reload, also try to close out with limit orders if you can.  You gotta find what works for you, i prefer higher time frame trading in this environment, but i imagine range trading the consolidation periods is profitable until you get on the wrong side of a bart.
Sweet summer child...

Everyone here has different strategies and it's best to assume nobody ever shares their complete reasoning for taking a position. Good luck - most other small players on Mex are also thinking they can make an easy $100 bucks a day, which is why it doesn't actually happen for most of them. Try to find an edge first; that will take trial and error.
Dude use limit. Don't get greedy and you can swing trade away. Careful though its still gambling.
better to use bigger positions size and lower margin, then you do not get catched so easily. and just cut losses fast when going wrong way
Probably more like don't input your API keys in bots or random places you didn't program yourself.
And/or Syscoin?

[EDIT: Would prefer correction comments to downvotes. Am I wrong, because Syscoin is sound, the vulnerability was Binance's, and Syscoin was only targeted due to low hashrate rather than any vulnerability in the coin? I'm still learning, hence the question mark in original post.] 
The moment ETHUSD breaks this trendline, I think ratio will go up. If BTC falls here, then it will mostly stay flat to down as bear markets tend to pull money towards BTC.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/bVOUdLt2/

Bearish on the ratio. Sold my small ETH stack around 0.079. I saw strong resistance at 0.08 so I got the fuggout.

I won't touch ETH again unless it falls below 0.04 or 0.03. It has been overvalued, is still overvalued. I've said it before and I'll say it again: ETH is not sound money. Hold Bitcoin.

I can see ETH/USD having some upside, but ratio will lose ground to BTC in the long term I guarantee it.
I think it will fall down further. ETH will have some serious competition for the #2 spot in EOS and Tezos. Also ETH never actually experience a bear market.
Should have...could have... didnt. 
I also got stopped, but had mine higher.

!short xbtu18 close 6606

Oh well, I prefer this over plummeting back into the 5s.
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 6,492.00

* Average value: 6,492.00

* Closing value: 6,515.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 33.00%

* PnL: -0.60%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Stop playing bearish & start playing long
Yeah.
There is a binance api telegram if you are having issues. Also, make sure you have no spaces when you permit ips.
anyone was affected by the SYS pump? Any service you subscribed to that caused your account to buy/sell?
yea, small orders on shitty altcoins

The way the mark prices on bitmex is confusing and not intuitive at all, it jumps so violently during moves up and down unlike the swaps. What you are seeing is bitmex futs is trading at mark prices where on okex, premium is determined by traders so it actually reflects sentiment more organically. This is also imo, the underlying reason people prefer the swaps, but it has its own set of problems like funding going rollercoaster and punishes trend following rather than counter trenders.
Why do you think it will be a shit show? 
>Should be a shitshow.

<record scratch> It's not
everything seems to be just fine 
Whatever happened last few hours got already priced in last minutes
Give it time. Mr. Bear Whale has to go OTC for like 500 million worth of BTC and that takes some hours.  Then he has to get it on all the exchanges.  So in about 12 hours we can have our proper Binance "panic" dump.
In the interests of balance I hope you also posted this in the fidget spinner sub reddit to let them know the bad news...
Pretty useless comparison. Sample size of two? 

Bitcoin has a use, I’m using it - many are using it as a store of value. 

This trend dropped because the price dropped, and the price dropped because smart money cashed out and took insane profits. Fidget spinners just became boring and old.

The google trends show the same thing as the price charts do for bitcoin - that the market dropped massively in price and lost a bunch of newbie interest (weak hands), this is obviously no secret.
It's absolutely hilarious to see the type of comments that come out during times like this. 

:)
Yeah, because we know that all serious institutional investors learn about buying bitcoin by googling for it.
Yep, would have shorted fidget spinners.
https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=all&geo=US&q=facebook,myspace

Two fads. Nearly identical. Maybe give some proof that Snapchat and Twitter will last.
Looks like the British pound is dead too. Just a fad!

https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?q=Pound&geo=US
Spinner futures when?
Outstanding. You compared "buy bitcoin" with "fidget spinners", instead of simply "bitcoin" or "buy fidget spinners", which would have been more fair. It also might have been fair to include other search terms that encompass crypto instead of solely "bitcoin". Do give yourself a pat on the back though.
If you would have played that bull cross on August 5 last year, you would have been rich AF.
Hedge all the coins
Not really 
An ascending wedge is a bearish signal.
Yea there's like 0 excitement about buying right now. I agree with you that the little one candle pumps look really weird. That being said, it's to be expected as we're still very much in a bear market. There will need to be a lot more powerful moves up to sustain any form of healthy rally. People need to feel FOMO again.
The volume's been pretty damn consistent actually on the 4hr.  You can see the ever so slight variance in buy/sell pressure comparing the price movement scale versus the volume (though that doesn't account well for how fast the books were slipping in either direction which is sort of lost information unless you have a tensorcharts record)

The most recent one is the only outlier.
Oh, it's you again - *waves*. Don't you have better things to do?
 Bitcoin/Litecoin maximalist loyal to Coinbase is ~~beautiful~~ ~~hypocritical~~ schizophrenic.


When I saw my mother in law last week, it raised....something? 
On the 1w chart it dropped every week. Samething?
Something. Something?
Step 1. Check your outgoing wallet transactions?
Have you contacted blockchain.info ?
Sure ;)
Isn't it blockchain.com now?
You dun goofed. 
I don’t see what you see. 
Yeah they're trying to get people to send 10 ETH, saying that they'll get 100 ETH in return. Sounds pretty fishy. Why are they celebrating with giveaways at a time like this?
Crap
They are pretty great actually, they handled the situation with transparency, communication and memes
This is some seriously strange price action 
You need to try /r/cryptocurrency.

People here hate ICO scams.
spam? your link doesn't end in .edu? and main site takes to a german site that has Produkte (products?)
I am, sloppy is in secret, are you?
[removed]
username checks out.
First ever post in here.

Shorted the very very top of that wick, almost the actual top. 

Posts about it 5 hours later 

###Yea Ok
Nice username...
Lol.
With you on this one shorting at 6750. Good luck bro.
Please avoid shitposting, thank you.
I’m just going to install a gym next to my computer 
Hahaha this just made my night 
>Secure asset fund for users (SAFU) lololol

PMSL
I read it has quickest of the 3 legs up... consistent with an ascending wedge formation. His logic is completely plausible. 
I think a lot of that also has to do with being married to your position. 

I had probably the best short entry you could get in the 6k range in the past week. But, I need to be responsible with my trading and not let my drunk self get in the way of my profits and strategies. Although it was a great entry and if this does crash the potential for incredible gains is there, Ide rather not be caught with my pants down. 

On top of it, say you’re busy or drunk or whatever and you have a small window to close your position. You’re mindset definitely isn’t in the right state of mind to make rational trading decisions, where closing prior to yourself getting busy prevents you from making a terrible choice 
My advice: Set stops and live your life. Charts will do what they do with you monitoring them. 
Also, just a heads-up for the future if you're tracking my trades - I traditionally layer in as we approach support/resistance, then close once I'm comfortably in the green. Therefore, my trades are usually profitable but don't maximize potential gains.
Sorry, I should have clarified that I was closing early since I was gonna be out all day and didn't want to track prices. I believe u/coingurrruu's reasoning was the same.

$6800 is heavy resistance and we had that bear div, so I doubted we'd make it through in one fell swoop (and no guarantees we do from here) so it was great r/r for a short. I just wanted to make a quick scalp off the top. I even said in one of my replies that I likely closed early. I just didn't want that hanging over my head all day.

Anyway, I guess that's the issue of posting your trades on here for everyone to see haha. Anyway, nice job on your short entry. I'm glad you stuck to your conviction.
I mainly closed my position for personal reasons, not technical. 

Price action is weird currently I’ll continue to be out of position until the direction is 100% clear 
Long from 6300. Was debating whether to close at 7000 or 7300. Now I think I'll shoot for 7500 because seeing the short-bus riders get all excited about these weak little red candles is a very bullish sign. Friday will be another interesting day, probably something like last Friday with a lot of forced buying.

Keep shorting, guys. It's just extra buy pressure whether you close with a dinky little profit or get stopped out on the next mighty surge upward.
You're totally right. I'm contrarian AF though and there has already been a ton o pain and too many people in here are acting like the sky is falling so seems like a good spot to rally from if history is any guide. 
Yeah MACD. I like the slope on the StochRSI more myself but the MACD is just icing on the cake. 
No joints in my country :D ..

Sigh
% wise, it's not a huge loss but still.. It was a thousand dollars bro :)

I've almost recovered though
Thanks man :D Appreciate it
nice call
If it's a hedge it's not underwater :-P
Smart money shorting the bottom ? 
I will mate. These joints aren't going to smoke themselves. :) 
Definitely was, but it was calculated. Been on laptop 20/last24 hours planning reentry. Thanks though man.
Yeah I'm just leaving it there until and monitoring. I'm expecting some kind of pull back. 
Too obvious for it to play out that way imo. Would be amazing if it did though as it would be very easy to trade.
I actually trade on BitMex and since their spread is pretty crazy near the support/resistance so I just want to take the advantage. 
What in the Sam Hill 
Of course that is true, by definition, although I do realize that people here are often ignorant of the basic investing and market definitions.

Bull market starts $0.01 right after the bear market low.  So of course it would be happening before people noticed it.
78 would be the first step where many mid term bears would switch to bulls so its a pretty big deal. 
Yes, right now it is very low probability that $5775 is 2018 low.   Not 0%, not 100%...very low probability...well below 50%.
What do you think about holding a long from 6450?  It's fat, and if we break up the profits would be significant to me, so I'm having a hard time letting it go.  (already closed half of it at 6750, and I'm still at a net loss from some previous tom-foolery that this is in revenge to.  Fully closing it here would be just about break even on the previous idiocy.)

Still got another long too that I added to on the previous drop, bringing ca to  6400, but it's half the size of the one in question.  This one I'm working with a level head and will not touch until a move down or a couple moves up, it's not tainted with any other sentiment.

Told myself a couple hours ago to just walk away and not touch anything, not set any profit orders nor stops, and wait for another move.  Maybe that is the best.

Edit: wtf do you even typo
>no way

until there is a way. I learned from Bitcoin that almost anything is possible to happen in this market...
There is a 200BTC wall on the 6800-6805 range, I agree. We are not breaking that resistance easily, but maybe in a few pushes.
At least he has insight, all you ever do is mock everyone in here. You literally provide nothing of value at all to this daily. 
This "prediction" is literally TA
High praise from yourself, thanks, I appreciate it. 
>needlessly antagonistic,

That's just me being me, I cannot help myself really, I don't mean it in a bad way... 
And that's why we have stop loss orders. 
Random Boy Serivce? The newest ICO from Brock Pierce?
Boy service - I think I'm in the wrong reddit

revealing slip
Ok... Butt Service...
where do I apply for this boy service you speak of? need more money to buy the crypto
[http://stockcharts.com/school/doku.php?id=chart\_school:technical\_indicators:parabolic\_sar](http://stockcharts.com/school/doku.php?id=chart_school:technical_indicators:parabolic_sar)
Fuck is that really how yacht is spelled?! Pretty fucked when you’re drunk.
> I’m very interested to see how this affects the YATCH market now.
> 
> FTFY
   
   What is the YATCH market?


That's what I generally type in, due to old habit.  But wasn't there some drama about them or something?
> blocktrail

"Acquired by bitmain" *grumble grumble*

> blockchair

Actually this one is pretty cool, lots of interesting supplementary info about addresses, and the site doesn't seem to have a marketing agenda.
>I don't think it's going to be as useful as you think. Sure it'll be interesting, but the reason why psychology is considered a soft science even though they follow research methods and statistical analysis and stuff, is because humans are diverse and change. Andit might just be one of many reasons for movement.

Of course. I'm not expecting a holygrail of max profits. Am mostly just curious to different perspectives and I feel it's a worthwhile perspective.
Not necessarily ... it totally depends on the time frame.  Any sustained price over $8600 would make me think we possibly found a bottom... but that’s a ways away.  I think more than likely we visit $4.4k - $4.9k before this is over. Of course I’d prefer to be wrong about this ...
Welcome in crypto world.
Like any other stock trading...
damn good position. im shorting from 6710. tight stop losses. im looking to swap to long at the bottom of the flag.
Oh look, it's everyone's favorite /r/bitcoinmarkets troll. Let me spell it out for you: Every once in a while, people make posts based on an emotional response, and although it may not be technically accurate, it fits the current market sentiment based on that emotion. 

So yes, it is just a 3% rise, but it came off of the Binance hack FUD and the overall sentiment that the price of bitcoin was headed back down. But you already knew that, didn't you. 

Welcome to the ignore list, you'll find plenty of like-minded company there!
I predicted double top when BTC was ~6350 range, but it pumped more so I have been underwater short.

This could really go either way but not really seeing any dumps. Looks like BTC is stuck between two HVN's at the moment

https://www.tradingview.com/x/zSs4Gpg2/
*You are now being watched by the FBI.*

Seriously now, this means anyone following your channel will get real time notifications on the mobile phone every time you create or alter a position on the bot.

In your case, your history page is [http://anotherbot.info/history.php?user=coingurrruu](http://anotherbot.info/history.php?user=coingurrruu) and you can see on top a link to the **PushBullet Channel**.
You're right, I should have been more specific. I'm seeing them from the 15m to the 6h, so a couple of them would have to be confirmed.
Well here we are back at just under 6600.
I slept with asks on the book, woke up short.
Not interested in advice from 10k longers like yourself who missed the entire move down, but I will be long on a move from 6800-7800.
Or is it unbullable?
Aren't mutual funds owned by companies that can go bankrupt and lose all of your money in a global crisis greater than the last recession?
2008-2009 was not that long ago.
No, it's not. It doesn't account for 

A. increased transaction costs 

B. liquidity issues for bills, especially unexpected ones

C. systemic market corrections

D. catastrophic failure of the market sphere (eg executive order 6102 type scenarios across G6/7/8 countries). 

E. [idiosyncratic stupidity](https://www.independent.co.uk/life-style/gadgets-and-tech/news/bitcoin-value-james-howells-newport-landfill-hard-drive-campbell-simpson-laszlo-hanyecz-a8091371.html)

100% into something reflects a lack of understanding about variance and volatility. Log scale preferences (which humans have) are almost always better off with some diversification. It's the reason insurance is a net positive. 
you'll get rid of a lot of them tho
Well, yeah.

It’s not like I see one thing and throw my hands in the air like this is it... lol

I didn’t think I would have to explain that. 

Delusional posts like this reinforce my belief that we’re going down and wash away my doubts that we’re not. 
It's only like the 1,000th hack!
7k would be enough to dump this market tho
His name is harry
Hey Mike are you still holding your long from, If I remember correctly, 7k or so?
Big Green Dildo
i think we shouldn't discuss it here as the mods might get unhappy with that ;) 

you could check my comments history though where i did mention which alts i trade, but my portfolio is changing from time to time a bit 
I also live in the US and I'm looking to get into margin trading do you recommend kraken?
The premium has been way higher. 
GBTC is literally for those who can't be bothered to create an exchange account or are too technologically unsavy for it. It's volume is a fraction of bitfinex's volume. I don't know what you're trying to divine from this.
Mex lagged like hell on this move up. Couldn't open anything from 6560 until it went back to 6730.

Managed to close my hedge on be and reopen at 6720 ;-)

Bit salty though, almost flipped at 6550 but seconds later it started...
Did you end up closing manually or are you still holding it?

I have a yolo bottom-fishing long from 6450 that also barely missed a target so I manually closed half of it at 6750.

On the fence to either try to ride it out and potentially add to it on the next (probably inevitable) drop, or just close it here for good profit and reset.  Seems like a good entry to not lose though but it'd be significant paper profits to potentially watch disappear.
I was buying the bottoms there too, since we started dropping too fast below $7k. I'm a scalper. I'm not recommending anyone follow my trades or hold anything similar for long-term, but it's very possible this could retrace slightly even if it continues to move up from here. I'm also trying to find the top of this cycle the higher we get.
Protect that winning streak!
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,725.00

* Average value: 6,725.00

* Closing value: 6,670.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 10.00%

* PnL: 0.57%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I just opened up my short this morning _because_ it was moving up too fast for my tastes. I'm not sure how that sways my decision.
lol, never change
Losing money? You should check out his trading history
Maybe because we are in the bearish trend, because we are at the top of ascending wedge, because we are overbought on 1 and almost overbought on 4 hours, because the longs/shorts ratio does not favor longing,...Everyone has his own strategy, so stop being such a bulltard and start listening to other opinions.
We're in a downtrend, haven't made a higher high yet and are right below resistance. It's a traditional short entry with good r/r.
This is usually what I look at. Also indicators that measure volume can show divergences between price and oscillators. 
Is this dump a fakeout? lol..
No, but CZ twitted they are safe 
I think they're more specifically referring to setting a new low, below the $5700-ish we set recently. 
> 334

That's very specific.

Just imagining someone saying this with a straight face makes me giggle.
Sir... SIR? 
A lot of those longs will take a hit down to 5k, a lot of will open on a way down. We can see part of them close but I don't think we could see any long squeeze soon.
And even so, people will be bottom fishing the whole way down.  For every long that closes at least another one seems to open.  I don't see the bottom fishing to lighten up unless there is an extended slow bleed.
Fixed it. I continuously do that am I’m not sure why lol.

I’ve non stopped call bull flags bear flags for like the last week
Read comment below 
So he should just ignore new data and can mever change his view on the market as the market develops? 
It's still a massive wedge. 12+ days now
Good man thanks! I did play about with auto and log/linear and the settings and it's working again now and even though the settings are the same(I think). I tried to check/uncheck auto just to see my chart but the scale didnt immediately start working again for some reason.
> All this upward movement can be interpreted as ABCDE correction (clear ABC on alts) and measured movement down would put us down to 4.8k. (5.4k first).

iirc Trade Devil yt channel has been saying this for the past couple of weeks
What timeframes do you trade on? Personally, I don't have the cojones to trade the charts when these Barts come back, so I salute you.
I said in 3 days. I thought the possible iH&S would have a steeper base line... still think it will go down one more time if this it the turn around from our early-May-decline. (3 days, now 2 days can still be true. the possible left shoulder had a low of 6115)
I personally think is going to bull flag for 12-24 hours. I’ll have a nice opportunity to close my scalp short and swap long. 
S.A.F.U
Lol are you serious?  Your chart actually backs up what I am saying, the red candle is fucking enormous on that day.  From above 10,600 to 9,400 in one day.  After that, the slide down to hell at 7,320 in 10 days.

Also I lived it, I remember all this happening.  We were starting to recover and then the VIA hack happened and it was over.  This time we aren't dying from the Binance hack.  Very bullish indicator for me.
You might be right.

But volume also tends to dry up near the end of a rising wedge.
This means he is short
meaning we have all overinvested.
Except it won't continue. 4xxx before 7xxx
There are a few moments when this thread actually makes me laugh out loud like a dumbass sitting on the toilet. Thank you.
If I wasn't holding -70% bags I could probably give you gold. 
Yeah I know, whales were accumulating at 17k too. Damn those whales.
Good, more fuel for the squeeze.
Damn fucking futures and you shorters have destroyed crypto. 
It is not over yet.
Thanks, will do next time 
Good info. Thanks man..  So if I use 1k worth @ 25x vs 500 @ 50x would the gains be the same? Or since the leverage is higher better percentages?
This is really, really good advice.  So much experience behind this advice, gained through blood and tears.
Lol I lived in Vegas for 4 years.. It might sound strange but I never gambled once there
If they were to liquidate me, is it only the amount I originally put in the trade or do they eat the whole account?
Only use limit when I'm not looking at the site..  But they take forever to fill that's why I went to market.  
But this was literally the funnest part of my day yesterday. I got a $4 raise at work and was still smiling more when I was looking at the charts nonstop lol 
100% this. Has happened on other exchanges in the past too.

Not really a “hack” if people have given API keys to some random internet bot
There was nothing wrong with SYS blockchain. The report about blockchain hacks and low hashrate were false.
I think your edit explains the downvotes. Your first question implied that you should not use "Syscoin APIs?", which was a more or less pointless (?) question. 
EOS seems to be shooting itself in the foot lately.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.0521  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/74875)
What about Cardano?
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,501.00

* Average value: 6,501.00

* Closing value: 6,606.00

* Leverage: 4.00X

* Stack: 25.00%

* PnL: -1.87%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


You re opening in $6800s? 

I’m short again. But i honestly think this is going to 7k+
I’m not really bearish.

Just wanted to jump on the potential opportunity that the Binance thing would blow up, so I hedged a short  to help protect my assets. 

I was long from $5800/$6100/$6200 and closed yesterday for a 36%ish perfect gain @ $6600. 

You can still be bullish and short resistance points for a quick scalp. $6800 has proven to have Iron balls of steel and I’m expecting to get stopped there if we manage to get that high 
I didn’t have any sys buys or sells, everything looks kosher in my account.
I see, I’ve misunderstood the way Bitmex futs are priced. That explains a few things for me!

Thanks!
On swaps punishing the trend followers is how they stay liquid and how they prevent severe divergence from spot price. It's a different set of compromises for sure. I like that they have both that and futs. 

The mark price on fuys gets wonkey sometimes though. Recently on a long I had a stop loss with a lower price fill *before* a limit order a bit above it, in a non-wick situation, the last price wasn't even near the so yet (think i had the orders $30 apart). That did not end well. 
Usually the mark price does save me from premature stoppage from wicks though. 
Completely thought people would race for the doors due to the 2nd recent hack in Binance recent times combined with not being able to access their funds for ~8 hours. 30 minutes in and I am looking wrong! Not too mad about it though, as it does trend in line with my hypothesis that a majority of the weak hands have exited crypto. 
Balance will come when Thanos wills it.
I don't think Snapchat or Twitter will last, nor Reddit or Facebook.  As you pointed out, the decline is already happening.  However, that still doesn't make them fads.  Bitcoin was very popular for a few months and only a small set of enthusiasts cared about it prior to that and a slightly bigger amount of enthusiasts care about it now.  Overall, outside of that interest has clearly fallen off the map in the same way it did fidget spinners.  As the price continues to decline, it'll only get worse.
lol, can’t you read the y axis labels?
https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=all&geo=US&q=Pound

Looks like you cherry picked data to me.
https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=today%205-y&geo=US&q=bitcoin

Literally no different in the formation of the chart.  A rapid rise in interest and a rapid fall.  A successfully completed fad.
Like I said: I don't buy it.
Exactly.

"It's another battle between bulls and bears. Each high is higher than previous and each low is successively higher as well. The difference being, the angle of ascent is steeper on the rising bottoms line. The steeper of the two trendlines in both the rising and falling wedge patterns will generally not hold because it becomes harder for bulls to sustain that acceleration in price. Though the highs are successively higher, their angle of ascent is less steep which implies bulls are not able to push prices high enough to maintain a complete rising trend channel. That is bearish."

DYOR.

[https://www.tradingview.com/chart/XBTUSD/SYNuYytt-Ascending-Wedge-30M/](https://www.tradingview.com/chart/XBTUSD/SYNuYytt-Ascending-Wedge-30M/)
FOMO is unsustainable. This should go with steady growth. Bear market will end when we won't see lower lows, but yeah, a lot of people will know this after we'll be high enough, that's why a lot of people are trying to catch good long entry here.
Time for a trip to cougar town I guess...
On the 10y it raised. something?
It’s an amazing opportunity dude hope ur not missing out on this opportunity of a lifetime.
Lmao
What company is worth millions/billions that can’t get their account and business back on top of that I believe funds could be drained even more or they get hacked again
No it's very real.
> and memes

Are they trying to get thrown in jail?
Yeah, but, they can't just bribe users and sweep things under the rug. The last time they had some API related issues and got away with it, this time too.

I agree that they handled it very well, but I feel like this is gonna happen again.
It looks as though it will continue until about the 9th. Slow rising triangle to $7k. Then a pullback to around $6250. Long until, then Short from $6925.
Thanks, didn't know. 
Yea this sub prefers traditional scams like pyramids and P&Ds, none of that new fangled ICO scam shit.
We do not use edu domains in Germany. Also, unipark is one of the premier survey hosters (like survey monkey). Selling survey hosting is their product. 
.edu is mainly used by 'muricans.
It's legitimate, i took it yesterday. I did research in college and everything they are doing is by the book

Edit: also they don't ask for contact info aside for an email and even that is voluntary.
ad hominem much?
I do sets of pushups now to take my eyes off of the charts, or to pull myself away from getting chopped up trying to juggle an entry/exit.

It does also seem to help give a quick cleanse to the state of mind to not make a shit decision.  Or give relief and clearer thinking after getting burned.

No joke, started doing this in the last couple weeks.  ^still ^made ^some ^shit ^decisions ^tho ^haha
You're well on your way with the great trades you've been making. Keep it up! Also, pushups and plyometrics at home by the computer isn't a bad alternative!
I'm surprised you don't layer out also.
Could you kindly highlight what timeline you noted bearish divergence on? Are you talking about the divergence June 30-July 2nd, or July 2nd to today? 
'dinky little profit' is better than the large losses it seems you have accumulated over the past weeks/months... 
I think your own sentiment affects how you perceive the sentiment here. For example, I am bearish and feel that people are too excited about this pump from the lows.

It also seems the best argument people expecting a rally have is that the price has been falling for too long and we are 'due' a rally. That sounds quite dubious to me. 
I know, it’s hard to grow weed in Antarctica 
Im pretty confident this is not the bottom. Good luck too you if you think so. ;) Markets just love to delay the pain.
Smoke a joint. Beat off. Everything will be well. 
I mean, there does seem to be a rising wedge. A retest of support around $6250 wouldn't be bad. 
I do the same with limit orders to close positions. Bitmex often wicks right through resistance when the system gets overloaded and there is a back log of people spamming market orders.
Many mid term bears switch to bulls every day at every price.  

You just said that if the price crosses $7800, then there's a high probability that ATH will be taken out.  We will agree to disagree.
This definitely has more bullflag tendencies than a bart flag. We didn’t start sloping upwards. 

Personally if i were you, Ide close half ( which you did) and let it ride to B/E. Wait to see how this flag plays out. If we slope downwards with a volume decrease I would consider adding to it. This definitely feels like it could push above 7k+. 

I dont see us flash crashing here or pushing up here either. We will most likely see 24-36 hours of consolidation in a 100$ ish range before our next move, which seems to be the pattern 
I am long from 6470 and am holding onto it with stops just below 6600. Why don’t you just add a stop and let it ride. If it hits your stop, you’ve locked in profit, and if it breaks upwards, you can re-evaluate.
Here ya with the walking away.  Got wicked out of my long from 5900 at 6450...and *of course* it’s a V bottom.  Now I’ve got to sit it for a break above ~6800.  Same thing with ETH.  Long 410 and wicked at 458.  I had a chance to get back into position at the bottom drunk last night but, I acted *responsibly*.  Sucks.  Sticking to a plan really isn’t as fun as rage trading.  
Almost anything.

It can't go straight up.
Fuckin oath he does.. give substance mate!
Freudian Lick, I mean Slip.
I think you have to pay extra for that...
Thanks man.
Yet Another Couple Hundred Thousand
He is stating the people from EOS are out boat shopping as they are clearly not running a distributed decentralized blockchain
No
I honestly would not mind either since I have funds to DCA and my plan is to start DCA-ing at ~$5300 (50% of funds), then the rest sub $5K. If we have a reversal and actually go with a bull market, then I will keep those funds for the future. Right now it looks like we're in a limbo. 
Not really. At least with stocks I can read the news and learn *why* I got fucked.
This is literally an online casino
>  people make posts based on an emotional response, and although it may not be technically accurate,

Yes they do.  And it's a huge waste of time to read about people's feelings when they post inaccurate nonsense.   Time is money.

"Mother of all bear traps = 3%"
Awesome, thank you. 

I’ll donate some BTC to you tomorrow when i have some time. You’re work is awesome 

Much appreciated 
Mostly bull.
That's not how it works though. The mutual fund company can go bankrupt but the funds itself are held by a custodian bank and are not part of the company's assets. In the event of bankruptcy they would be transferred to another fund or distributed to customers.
Longer ago than January 2018
So? Even if you invested right before the crash your money would have doubled, not bad in 10 years for the safe boring retirement investment. 
It would have been right in 2015
> 100% into something reflects a lack of understanding about variance and volatility

I think it mostly reflects overconfidence and lack of understanding of the uncertain/probabilistic nature of life. 
\>you'll get rid of a lot of them tho

Not necessarily true, I've read that cult-like groups actually get more vocal after they have been proven wrong. It was a research about cults predicting end of the world scenarios. You'd expect them to shut the fuck up after the date has past  and the world still exists; but they became even more aggressive into getting people to join them after being rekt.

I forgot if it was Dan Ariely's Predictably Irrational book or Steven Levitt's Freakonomics /SuperFreakonomics.
Those coins are stained for criminal activity. You can't just sell them on an exchange (that has influence on global bitcoin pricing).
He’s short from $6420
i m stupid! Thank you
Haha yeah fair enough. Ok I'll have a bit of a stalk :)
Yeah, fees are a little heavy but it’s the best option as far as i can tell. Up to 5x 
I thought it was an institutional vehicle? I literally know nothing about it beyond hearing Barry talking about it years ago.  


It's volume is fuckall? Then disregard what I said above. 
Yeah... I had the same problem trying to open a long @ 5950 the other day... Didn't go through and then the Wi-FI at the place I was staying in the middle of nowhere on Bali died and I wasn't able to eventually enter later in the day until 6355.

QQ

Gotta hate it when your brain makes the right call but you're unable to make it happen.

ps spamming the button helps ; D
I'm sitting on a long from 6355 and am pretty confident on pushing up into 7XXX in the coming days so I'll either win or hate myself later. Might try scalp if I see a good place to sell on another overconfident BGD within the near future.

SL set @ 6409.

\\
Oh yes I would expect a 6300 test, just saying this sub gets pretty hypocritical sometimes haha
Thanks! I think the streak is getting to my head, since I'm getting tempted to close early now. I figure I'll be fine as long as I can close in the green every time though.

You're having a nice stretch yourself I've noticed. Good luck!
dumping $1,000 in one day multiple times on the way down...no big deal

up $800 in 5 days after dropping $4,000 from the start of the bear run ....whoa nelly, hold your horses you don't want to go up too fast. 
What is r/r stands for?
Painting a wedge style formation so far (wedge aside, it's at least hugging the most fresh support line), so everyone is just aggregate encouraging it to do what they expect it to do.

Keep on toes for another test of support now that it's in the neighborhood.  Then if it breaks out, keep on toes to see if it keeps going, stalls out, or goes back up to test support as resistance.
he didn't say "Fundsu are safu". Maybe it was not him tweeting.
Not sure who "they" is, but I responded to the post above, which says nothing about new 2018 low.
Pavlov'd during the last six months, eh? 
Got that bear blood in ya, dontcha?
Where did I said that? I'm only pointing out that this is not yesterday's wedge taht everyone was talking about. So it does not still fits perfectly.
Np bro! 
Medium-long term. If you read my post history, I exited a great long last night and hedged on the small chance that the binance hack was significant.

This is me essentially taking the hit on my profits and getting back into my position since my medium term viewpoint hasn't changed. Basically 5X long with a CA of now ~5980 (was ~5870).

I'm willing to hold this until ~sub 6.3k or until my target is reached.
Thx for reply.

Oh ..  well .. let's see. Good luck
Just barts barting
> the red candle is fucking enormous on that day. 

Just like more than 20 other red candles this year that are similar or bigger on zero news.

>  After that, the slide down to hell at 7,320 in 10 days.

Just like 5 other slides to hell this year. This is a bear market, wtf are you expecting?

> Also I lived it, I remember all this happening.

Yeah, you're in a trading sub, so are we.

> We were starting to recover and then the VIA hack happened and it was over.

How were we recovering? with two red daily candles before VIA news? With a double top and failing to break 11800 before the VIA news?
Yeah, why not?

!short XBTUSD 6725.2 5x 3%
You bottom shorters have such great fundamental analysis
Why won't it continue? The only sell pressure I see is little retail shorts giving their money away. Tell you what: Bart it down after the next BGD to 7K. I mean Bart it down the full 5 percent. Then maybe I'll think the Mad Dumpers have found more coins to sell at a loss. Because they and misguided retail shorts are the only ones selling now in case you hadn't noticed.
i dont think shorters have. instituionalized futures yes; but if there is ever a new bull run with public participication they have found their match
The gains would be the same in dollar value because the notional value is the same, but you would have a higher ROE on x50.
Use position margin so they only liquidate what u put in
as long as you use isolated margin, i.e. 5x, 10x, 25x, etc. you are limited to the portion you put up for that trade. if you move the slider to CROSS and get liquidated, it's your entire account.
It's fun, I've been home most of this year due to unforseen circumstances and have been swing trading every day I feel its safe. I use limit though I hate paying fees. If its an emergency I will use market.
It's essentially the same as sharing passwords.
I asked about Syscoin (not Syscoin APIs), because at certain points today there was at least speculation that there was a vulnerability with Syscoin. I guess that question has been resolved. This has all been evolving over the last several hours, so I don't see how that question was so ludicrous 

(Not sure what a "pointless question" is, regardless. all questions have a point: seeking information)

[EDIT: And again, even if my question was so idiotic, genuine questions don't deserve downvotes, they deserve to be either ignored or answered] 
> Also ETH never actually experience a bear market.

Down 20% is bear market and ETH has done that probably two or three times.
Or VeChain?
No, probably not after that. I may get out of the way on this one. 
This goes to show the difference between transparency of a company vs silence. We all found out it was another hit on the API before trading resumed. It can't even be called a 'Binance hack'.

Some third party bots got hacked and it messed with Binance's trading through their API. It's not even Binance's fault I don't think.
Looks like some big trading bot was hacked
What are your thoughts on the future of the below asset, given the statements above?

https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=all&geo=US&q=Internet
>As the price continues to decline, it'll only get worse.

Fidget spinners don't have the potential to make people money. You are very naive if you don't think that interest will pick up dramatically if people believe they might be missing another bull run. 
It’s still valid in its own way. Shows an asset can form the same pattern but completely invalidate it on a larger timescale. Hopefully exactly the same will occur with bitcoin over the next 5 years. I certainly believe it will.
As did you. That’s the point.

This may be even more relevant, and a clearly dying asset.

https://trends.google.com/trends/explore?date=today%205-y&geo=GB&q=Pound
No, it is different. Of course, "buy bitcoin" is massively down - that's what a market cycle looks like for any commodity after the peak of a bubble. Searching for simply "bitcoin" isn't quite the same. The chart is still 5x it's 2015 bear market average. I would say if you see it continue to decrease, instead of bottoming or plateuing out as the chart shows signs of, then you may well be right.

You don't have very long to wait - but you do need to wait before crying "it's a fad and it's over now". I say maybe a year or two before you can say that, based on the chart alone. Be patient and rub it in our degenerate gambler faces later :).

Or a market crash, which literally everyone knows happened. Says nothing we don’t already know, and nothing about the future.
Better than a trip to Goblin Town. 
Yeah, like I said they should be focused on the hack, not giving away 10,000 ETH. 

They did come through with the giveaway though, so I gotta hand it to them.

Thanks Binance! It's amazing and was so easy!

It worked! I just got 100 ETH. Thank You!
Memes are illegal now?
On second look, next 4hr are likely to be red to $6520.
Only pushups? 

If you’re at your computer long enough, you may find yourself getting massive boobs because your constantly doing push-ups 
I should, I guess these barts are just giving me PTSD. I've tried doing that in the past and ended up losing out on much of my gains. I may experiment with letting a small portion run, considering I lost out on potential profits from 6300 to 6700 on the recent run up, and from 7600 to 6600 on the run down in June.
July 2nd to today. I figure it's mostly played out though, considering we retraced most of the pump to $6700, right? I'm still fairly weak with my divs.
>I think your own sentiment affects how you perceive

Most definitely, half of trading seems to be fighting your own biases, delusions and emotions.

\> we are 'due' a rally. That sounds quite dubious to me.

I don't mean that in the sense that we are 'owed' one, simply that BTC/USD operates in ebbs and flows... After extreme multiple month moves in one direction there is then a move in the opposite direction. The bubble cycle of Bitcoin since 2009 is all the evidence you need for that theory unless you're proposing the idea that it is now over.

Though sure, we could move down from here, I'm never an absolutist, anyone that is won't last long attempting to do this for a living... But eventually being 'due' a rally will be true unless Bitcoin = GG. All I'm saying is that there is a good chance that time is now. 
It's down 71 % from ATH , good luck to you too
Thanks man.  Really appreciate your input.  I needed the peace of mind too.
> Why don’t you just add a stop

Greed! (I mean, RR heh)  I do have a safety stop down at break even btw.

>  If it hits your stop, you’ve locked in profit

True, but I already locked in some at a better price point.

I think that 6600 would be an ideal candidate to get wicked out.  Especially on the low liquid december futures.  I've been burned out of too many winning positions in the past and I will not put a stop so close.

If you have not taken any profits yet, then I guess 6600 could be a good stop for you.  If I had done that stop instead of already taking some, and then I get stopped out at 6600 instead of BE, I guess total net profit would be roughly the same.  However in the scenario of the 6600 stop, I'd be out of position, and then have to play the choppy game of reentering.

I think half now, let the rest ride, provides better potential RR by minimizing the risk of losing the position, while still being safe from not taking a loss, and having upward potential.  True that just letting it ride with a close stop would maximize profit, but that assumes we go almost straight up from here which is rare.

Seriously though, careful, if this thing does a true bull flag, it'll probably flirt with 6600.  That's where I'll start watching to add to this position (but probably shouldn't, the ca is already too close)
Yeah man it's been fuckin rough.  *fist bump*
I personally think this is going to bull flag pretty nicely. 

I’ll be looking to close short around $6625 and swap long 
I guess YATCH is a kind of yacht. 
yes, their wallet is shit and was a terrible idea to start with
Technically you can do the same here.
Pressure's on now! 

Grats man, I still remember your first post here not so many months ago!  Fuckin rookie of the year right here.  
Go enjoy your fireworks and booze and whatever you guys do on this day.
Just call Will Smith if any aliens show up
Only by virtue of some things not happening though - there was no market wide correction, presumably you (nor me nor the person making the comment) had some unexpected large financial responsibility pop up, the whole world didn't decide to nuke crypto (just China lol) and neither of us lost their private keys either. You can think of holding fiat as basically insurance; if I have extra fancy auto insurance for a year and I don't get in any accidents, it doesn't mean that insurance was an unnecessary expense, it means that my single trial (or however many years I go without an accident) isn't manifest in the accident part of the distribution. If I do regret buying additional insurance, I'm either A. discovering what my preferences are, B. discovering what the risk distribution is like, or C. simply unlucky. 

The question is really just about risk preferences, volatility capacity and variance. The trade offs between the three are not symmetrical nor linear, which is why even minor diversification is a better fit for most people. 
Well yes, which is why gold bugs exist. But a lot of them will leave. Not all just a lot 
It's called the backfire effect. And it has been pbserved time and time again by behavioral economists.
Oh okay then 

I was about to ask him how he deals with stress when he’s in red for days. I don’t think many traders on this sub have as much patience as he does (I don’t have it either), but that’s something extremely important to learn. 
I managed to open long on 6.6 pump last time, it didn't work this time.

I really need to use different exchange on such a moves.
Thanks for sharing!  Think I should just take a step back for now.
I think yesterday *was* that test when it made it to 6400.  And another higher low would be next.
More or less, had a disastrous trade a few weeks ago though that I'm still chasing!

Getting tired of being safe after a streak is sorta what got me though, so keep playing it relatively safe! Don't need to maximize every single price movement. 
[Risk/Reward Ratio](https://www.investopedia.com/terms/r/riskrewardratio.asp). Shorting 6,725 with a stop above 6,800 or 7,000 assumes the risk of losing 1%/4% while the reward is above 6% for a revisit of the 6,300 support, about 11% for 6,000, or much higher in case we break down to a new low. A related concept that includes the probabilities you assign to future events is [Expected Value](https://www.investopedia.com/terms/e/expected-value.asp) (EV).
risk/reward
Risk reward?
https://twitter.com/cz_binance/status/1014347305783255040?s=21

“Funds are safe” 
You've been around, you know that when the market wants to go down, it tears us a new one. A hundred bucks down when trying to bart and another hundred bucks after the Binance thing... come on, wtf?
Nothing ever fits perfectly. 
You can continue to lament about semantics or place your shorts. Your choice.
What is your current target? I have low 7Ks if 6800 falls, but even there I might keep it since my CA is around 6K after I added at 6500. 
"What what makes you think Crab-17 is over, Mr. Rothschild?"
Actually, we have constant selling in case you haven't noticed. The selling is interrupted occasionally by a BGD of shorts closing and longs opening.

BGDs are not a good thing. It basically proves we are still in a bear market. There are no buyers at all. Ever since the 10k rejection, we've been in a constant downtrend. Then we get a weak rally made up of a few small BGDs that take us to the closest resistance, then we go sideways, then we dump to lower lows. You are assuming that this pattern is changed based on what? 
Figured. Just didn't know if the fees would eat way more using 50x
Dao was not a bear market..was a shitting stupid thing
Yeah no I totally agree, it's like someone getting into your email account cause you posted the password somewhere and then trying to blame yahoo, google, etc.
I don't think this internet shit is really going to take off man..
Don't think it's worth even attempting to engage in informed debate with someone who thinks "fidget spinners" is a good reference point for comparison in the first place.

In my experience, folks like this are incredibly likely to do some mental gymnastics to twist new evidence presented against their rationale and conform it to their bias.
Can't it be both? 
Haven't you heard? Europe is trying to pass a ban on memes. They're an effective tool against thought control for the young.
Actually I have a few exercises for therapy for my lower back too which help the core and upper legs.  But those are low resistance and don't fix the adrenaline rush of trading, just help to prevent the sedentary computer life from turning me into a gimp and causing a regression in an old back injury.

I should get a pull up bar or take the dumbells out of the closet...
Maybe put sell orders on this long between 6700~6900, and have some to ride.

I haven't put any orders though, for now I took enough at the 6700 level.

Oh dear there it goes...
Mmm, I see it now. And yeah, looks like classic bearish divergence, a higher high with a lower high. Danke.
Reallllly?! Oh i better should be going all in! Lol
I've already closed when it started to look like bull flag. Not entering anything yet.
No, you can't. A 10&#37; move can come out of nowhere, in minutes, with no news at all.
Remember I made 12 successful first trades in the $6400-$6700 range?

Then I accidentally opened up a long at $6700 because I didn’t know how to use Kraken and like 3 hours later we got the BGD?

Oh the glory days 
\>There are gold bugs believe that gold is a stable place to store wealth, and there are gold bugs who see gold as the only true currency.

Lmao i didnt realize gold had maximalists as well. Well this is some new i learned. Thanks my man.
How have gold bugs been proven wrong?  Gold has outperformed stocks over the past two decades...it has been a fantastic investment for the recent past as well as most of human history (unless you cherry pick the rapid growth in equities following the end of world war II) 

>I was about to ask him how he deals with stress when he’s in red for days. I don’t think many traders on this sub have as much patience as he does (I don’t have it either), but that’s something extremely important to learn. 

Risk management. I rarely use more than 5% of my stack per trade as should be the norm, and have pre determined soft entry and exit points. I'm more concerned about posting an overall quarterly gain than winning every trade.
Is a pain for sure. Did you read their last technical update? Sounds like they are working on resolving it... Dosen't help in the meantime though. 
it's 8am in europe, give it time... we got another red day
i'm not delusional enough to think this is the best spot to short.
I'll probably close if we get to around 7.2k, though I'm certainly expecting 6.8k resistance.

The r/r of holding through a test of pre 2014 bear ATH resistance -> Sept ATH resistance -> Nov/Feb/April Support that has likely turned resistance again just isn't worth it. Would then relong if we do push back above it.

(That line is pretty much the meme triangle line - draw on the weekly on bitstamp and you can see what I'm talking about)
Down 20% is bear market.
Agreed, people seemed interested at first but the fad burnt itself out and it’s a graveyard now...
He’s just a dedicated cashie making up reasons to take shots at BTC. Ignore.
Binance is from Asia, memes are safu
Trying it now.

!long xbtu18 profit 6640 5%
I already got scared and closed at 6600. Sorry, just not for me. Maybe once this bart nonsense is done with, I'll test it out again.
LOL , go ahead please short it !!! Taking any position is dumb as fuck now 
If we go by news then hack wasn't so bad, money will be repayed so those who panic sold yesterday bought back today when they read the news.
I love that story.

That same period is when haserfauld and jared's advice to me about laddering & scaling flow clicked and I finally graduated from years of just stumbling around with cludgy RR management.

Good times indeed.

Some day you'll show your grandkids that spot on the chart and.. ok thats enough lol.
> On the extreme end, however, gold bugs obsession with gold often has more to do with distrusting the modern banking system than trying to protect the value of a diversified portfolio.

:P there are a lot of similarities between gold bugs and btc maximalists
from what I understand gold bugs have been thinking the next run is right around the corner for a while now, constantly being proven wrong (that it's not around the corner) but you're right, I mainly just meant there will always be ardent supporters after a huge run/bubble
Got it, thanks! 
They're working on it for months...
See you at 6'100
isn't Malta in Europe?
Didn't they relocate to Malta? 
What are you doing on trading sub then? :D
The "hack" barely moved the price. That kinda reinforces my point. Much bigger moves happen on no news at all.
You don't happen to have a recap of the topics of laddering & scaling flow do you? I'd rather not derive the basics of trading through experience any more than I have to.
Lol sloppy theres a downvote bot again on you. I dont get why your reply right now about gold bugs gets downvoted too.
Good things take time they say. 
This will be fun

RemindMe! One Week
Possibly still in the process of doing so. And yes Malta is EU.
Watching people get rekt over trading 
I know, I'm ta guy, news sometimes move the price but from TA point of view that move wasn't so unexpected. 
Lucky you, I have a bunch of this stuff copy pasted somewhere.  I don't have the time otherwise to type stuff up (I'm working over in a different tab.  No, I'm not at work, it's 1am)

Someone on bitmex:

> As such, traditionally tight stops usually don't pan out well. 10% stop is a common average among traders, but it doesn't work so well on BitMEX. At 5x, that's only 2%. At 10x, it's 1%. What I've found is that 9/10 times, when BitMEX blows early, it will retrace within 2-3 minutes.
> 
> If I was 5x short at 8550, a 10% stop would be 8720. If I set a stop there, I would have been stopped on the spike to 8780. Within a minute or two, it was back under 8700. I could then decide if I wanted to bail or not. You can also set catastrophic stops (20%+) if you wanted to (I sometimes do), in case the engine craps the bed.

From /u/Haserfauld I think, on laddering in and out with orders to setup positions, and stop losses:

> Setting targets and layering accordingly is another extremely valuable strategy that helps give you some wiggle room.
> 
> For example, I'm leaning towards a short at the top of our current rising wedge. I love 8725 as a target and 8825 as time to bail, but I don't think I'll be gifted 8725. On the other hand, I don't want to open at 8600 with that wide of a stop, so I'm thinking about picking the % of my stack I want to use and splitting it into 20% chunks, which I'll layer equally from 8625 to 8725. That would give me an average of 8675, which is acceptable (to me) with a stop at 8825. Maybe only 8600 will execute and we'll dump, or maybe all will execute and I'll get stopped. But picking targets and layering is wildly helpful in reducing emotional decisions and having FOMO/FOLO screw you over. If it goes your way, it does cost you a little bit of profit, but I generally am most successful when I'm not trying to hit a homer.
> 
> Stops shouldn't be that tight. In general, if you like a position, enter and give it room to breath (I would have looked at 7240 for that). Or layer your position (20% every $25 from 7500-7400--OFF the round numbers: 7410, 7430, 7455, 7480, and whatever your first entry is). Safeguards against FOMO or entering badly. That way if it does drop to your 7240 stop, it's not off a 7500 average but off of a 7450 average. If it starts spiking up, you can add on the way up and your average will always be below your next entry. You give up a little profit by layering on the way up, but it's absolutely worth it.

From /u/jarederaj  I think on flow for layering in and out with adding to positions  (don't follow the extra bit in there about doubling down stakes after a loss, you should do the opposite, but it's interesting to read):

> I usually enter with 10% of stack, and will add up to 40% if it's moving with my expectations. Once I'm that far in, I usually set break-even stops. I don't go over 50% unless my entry is TWO resistance/support levels away from spot. I'll usually start with the lowest leverage possible, unless I'm betting against the trend and it's a positive funding rate. I rarely go over 5x, unless I'm already 100% in, which has only happened a couple times.
> 
> Oh, I divide my stash up into 20 stakes. After I close a trade I refactor it. When I lose a trade I double my stake. If I make a 16x stake and lose it then I have to start over at 1x. If I make a winning trade I start over at 1x.
> I can't ever lose everything this way... but I can lose a lot really fast on consecutive bad trades.
> 
> My best advice is after a position moves in it’s huge candles wait 10-15 minutes before it stabilizes and choose a position. Don’t FOMO I’m on a downward candle or an upward candle . In reality patience will save you often in this market.
> 
> Long support or short resistance or stay out of position until a breakout is confirmed.

Before these guys, I only layered out, but never layered in.  And their numbers gave really good starting points to trade safely. 
now it's a +5 upvote bot. lol

o_O

I contacted the admins and they said they looked into it/fixed it. Guess not...

it's actually really, really annoying either way because I can't tell if people here are upvoting me or downvoting me or it's just the bot. it's very discouraging, has kept me from commenting much these past few days
I will be messaging you on [**2018-07-11 14:08:05 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2018-07-11 14:08:05 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8vynby/daily_discussion_wednesday_july_04_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8vynby/daily_discussion_wednesday_july_04_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  One Week) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e1s0wmj)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
